hunspell/kpv/komi.aff
FLAG long
SFX O3 0 ясаяссяыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясті/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаястіныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаястіным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаястіныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаястіыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаястіым/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаястіыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаястӧ/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаястӧг/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаястӧгныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаястӧгным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаястӧгныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаястӧгыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаястӧгыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаястӧм/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаястӧмӧсь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясыдкӧд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясыдла/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясыдлань/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясыдлӧн/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясыдлы/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясыдлысь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясын/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясынӧсь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясыскӧд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясысла/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясыслань/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясыслӧн/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясыслы/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясыслысь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясысь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясаясысьӧсь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яскӧд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яскӧдыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яскӧдыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яскӧдным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яскӧдныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яскӧдныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясла/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яслань/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьын/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьӧ/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьысь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьсянь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьӧд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьӧдз/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьӧдзныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьӧдзным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьӧдзныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьӧдзыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьӧдзым/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьӧдзыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьӧдныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьӧдным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьӧдныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьӧдыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьӧдым/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьӧдыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьсьыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьсьым/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьсьыныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьсьыным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьсьыныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьсьыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьсяньныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьсяньным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьсяньныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьсяньыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьсяньыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьтіныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьтіным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьтіныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьтіыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьтіым/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьтіыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьым/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланьыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланяд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланям/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланяныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланяным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланяныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясланяс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яслӧн/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яслы/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яслысь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснад/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснам/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснаныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснаным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснаныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснас/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясныдкӧд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясныдла/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясныдлань/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясныдлӧн/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясныдлы/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясныдлысь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснымкӧд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснымла/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснымлань/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснымлӧн/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснымлы/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснымлысь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснымӧс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясныскӧд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснысла/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясныслань/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясныслӧн/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясныслы/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясныслысь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснысӧ/G1G2 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яснытӧ/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧ/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧдз/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧдзныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧдзным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧдзныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧдзыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧдзым/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧдзыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧдныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧдным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧдныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧдыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧдым/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧдыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧй/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧйкӧд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧйла/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧйлань/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧйланьсянь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧйлӧн/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧйлы/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧйлысь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧйся/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧйсянь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧйтӧг/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧн/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясӧс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссӧ/G1G2 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссьыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссьым/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссьыныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссьыным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссьыныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссьыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясся/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссяныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссяным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссяныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссянь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссяньныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссяньным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссяньныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссяньыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссяньым/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссяньыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссяыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 яссяыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясті/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ястіныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ястіным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ястіныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ястіыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ястіым/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ястіыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ястӧ/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ястӧг/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ястӧгныд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ястӧгным/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ястӧгныс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ястӧгыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ястӧгыс/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ястӧм/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ястӧмӧсь/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясыд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясыдкӧд/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясыдла/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
SFX O3 0 ясыдлӧн/G1G2G3 [аеёиіоӧуыэюяьй]
