hunspell/kpv/komi.dic
гӧрдов/A1O1O2O3
гӧрдоввиж/A1O1O2O3
пӧрысиник/A1O1O2O3
вевкӧс/A1O1O2O3
паськыдысь-паськыд/A1O1O2O3
тӧнъя/A2O1O2O3
гажа/A3O1O2O3
кушака/A3O1O2O3
ӧткузьта/A3O1O2O3
сулеяа/A3O1O2O3
беринӧсь/A4O1O2O3
гажакодь/A5O1O2O3
багдадса/A6O1O2O3
канберраса/A6O1O2O3
очса/A6O1O2O3
харьковса/A6O1O2O3
ырсканса/A6O1O2O3
вадорса/A7O1O2O3
кывпомса/A7O1O2O3
сельсӧветса/A7O1O2O3
улысладорбокса/A7O1O2O3
перспективатӧм/A8O1O2O3
кӧлысьдырся/A9O1O2O3
дінышладор/K1O1O2O3O6
асыввыв/K2S2O1O3O6
раскаин/N0O1O2O3O5O6
вуджӧдчанін/N0O1O2O3O5O6
лякӧссьӧмин/N0O1O2O3O5O6
сьӧдӧдӧмин/N0O1O2O3O5O6
кустаин/N0O1O2O3O5O6
вожала/N1O1O2O3O5O6
дьӧб/N1O1O2O3O5O6
посйӧд/N1O1O2O3O5O6
пӧддяз/N1O1O2O3O5O6
воканӧй/N1O1O2O3O5O6
силюк/N1O1O2O3O5O6
лудік-тӧрӧкан/N1O1O2O3O5O6
падко/N1O1O2O3O5O6
чукӧр/N1O1O2O3O5O6
юковтас/N1O1O2O3O5O6
тупляс/N1O1O2O3O5O6
малямуш/N1O1O2O3O5O6
рытань/N1O1O2O3O5O6
гора/N1A1O1O2O3O5O6
курыдва/N2O1O2O3O5O6
сёрнигижӧд/N2O1O2O3O5O6
ошгум/N2O1O2O3O5O6
пелыспу/N2O1O2O3O5O6
тьӧтӧ/N5O1O2O3O5
кыптанлун/N7O1O2O3O5
уджлун/N7O1O2O3O5
винатусяпу/N8O1O2O3O5O6
мортсям/N8O1O2O3O5O6
ылтас/N8O1O2O3O5O6
тӧрӧкушка/N9O1O2O3O5O6
бичуган/N9O1O2O3O5O6
принятӧй/N9O1O2O3O5O6
малас/N9O1O2O3O5O6
бережносьт/R1O1O2O3O5O6
познаваемосьт/R1O1O2O3O5O6
недочёт/R1O1O2O3O5O6
жилуслуга/R1O1O2O3O5O6
опалубка/R1O1O2O3O5O6
растушовка/R1O1O2O3O5O6
логика/R1O1O2O3O5O6
рисовалка/R1O1O2O3O5O6
песенка/R1O1O2O3O5O6
пионерка/R1O1O2O3O5O6
читка/R1O1O2O3O5O6
географичка/R1O1O2O3O5O6
пӧдпушка/R1O1O2O3O5O6
радиопрограмма/R1O1O2O3O5O6
неметчина/R1O1O2O3O5O6
полметра/R1O1O2O3O5O6
мачта/R1O1O2O3O5O6
любовнича/R1O1O2O3O5O6
парторгша/R1O1O2O3O5O6
змеелов/R1O1O2O3O5O6
госторг/R1O1O2O3O5O6
нефтегазопровод/R1O1O2O3O5O6
декупаж/R1O1O2O3O5O6
полуботинки/R1O1O2O3O5O6
прибой/R1O1O2O3O5O6
пинжак/R1O1O2O3O5O6
телик/R1O1O2O3O5O6
шеломайник/R1O1O2O3O5O6
белобилетник/R1O1O2O3O5O6
понедельник/R1O1O2O3O5O6
балаганчик/R1O1O2O3O5O6
миллионщик/R1O1O2O3O5O6
аэрофотоснимок/R1O1O2O3O5O6
технопарк/R1O1O2O3O5O6
адмирал/R1O1O2O3O5O6
формализм/R1O1O2O3O5O6
агротехникум/R1O1O2O3O5O6
политкаторжанин/R1O1O2O3O5O6
ворчун/R1O1O2O3O5O6
единство/R1O1O2O3O5O6
роно/R1O1O2O3O5O6
автокреслӧ/R1O1O2O3O5O6
исправленньӧ/R1O1O2O3O5O6
переутомленньӧ/R1O1O2O3O5O6
своеволльӧ/R1O1O2O3O5O6
подкоп/R1O1O2O3O5O6
конвейер/R1O1O2O3O5O6
забор/R1O1O2O3O5O6
светофор/R1O1O2O3O5O6
аванс/R1O1O2O3O5O6
шахмат/R1O1O2O3O5O6
пулемёт/R1O1O2O3O5O6
эксперимент/R1O1O2O3O5O6
уралист/R1O1O2O3O5O6
слабосьт/R1O1O2O3O5O6
рыбец/R1O1O2O3O5O6
рудознатеч/R1O1O2O3O5O6
шваль/R1O1O2O3O5O6
удлинитель/R1O1O2O3O5O6
полынь/R1O1O2O3O5O6
митрополия/R1O1O2O3O5O6
систематизация/R1O1O2O3O5O6
темя/R1O1O2O3O5O6
сала/R1O1O2O3O5O6# q салӧ
брызгӧвик/R2O1O2O3O5O6
белогорье/R2O1O2O3O5O6
дельталёт/R2O1O2O3O5O6
брудцейт/R2O1O2O3O5O6
антураж/R2O1O2O3O5O6
белемнит/R2O1O2O3O5O6
варваризм/R2O1O2O3O5O6
гидравлика/R2O1O2O3O5O6
джеб/R2O1O2O3O5O6
изафет/R2O1O2O3O5O6
комбинация/R2O1O2O3O5O6
маразм/R2O1O2O3O5O6
остракизм/R2O1O2O3O5O6
пудинг/R2O1O2O3O5O6
слябинг/R2O1O2O3O5O6
утилитаризм/R2O1O2O3O5O6
шкаф/R2O1O2O3O5O6
агул/R3O1O2O3O5
папуас/R3O1O2O3O5
патриархально-поместнӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
проекционнӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
баскетбольнӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
внушительнӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
гранатӧвӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
закономернӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
кистеперӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
лесопильно-деревообрабатывающӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
морально-нравственнӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
неспокойнӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
ӧчереднӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
помеснӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
раздвижнӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
скоропечатнӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
теоретическӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
фотоннӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
юрскӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
синопскӧй/R6A1O1O2O3
герценовскӧй/R6A1O1O2O3
леонтьевскӧй/R6A1O1O2O3
румыно-немецкӧй/R6A1O1O2O3
чукаибскӧй/R6A1O1O2O3
отзывтор/S6O1O3O6
биасянтор/S6O1O3O6
дав/S6O1O3O6
лавкатор/S6O1O3O6
тшынасянтор/S6O1O3O6
Шипсхед/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Бахрейн/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Гюмри/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Кирово-Чепецк/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Мерсия/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Пор/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Таймыр/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Шаннон/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Долон/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Постойна/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Самутпракан/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Пятиречье/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Эжадор/T2O1O2O3O5O6
Адзвавом/T2O1O2O3O5O6
Чукаиб/T2O1O2O3O5O6
Кырул/T2O1O2O3O5O6# (Syktyv)
Петырко/T2O1O2O3O5O6
